Utah statutes.
53-10-110.   Authority of officers and officials to take fingerprints, photographs, and other data.

The officers and officials described in Sections 53-10-207 through 53-10-209 shall take, or cause to be taken, fingerprints, photographs, and other related data of persons under this part.

